California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 institution, an approved institution, or from a continuing education provider that is identified as acceptable by the board pursuant to Section 4980.54. Undergraduate courses shall not satisfy this requirement.

(4) The applicant completes the following coursework not already completed in the applicant’s education from an accredited
 institution, an approved institution, or from a continuing education provider that is identified as acceptable by the board pursuant to Section 4980.54. Undergraduate courses shall not satisfy this requirement.

(A) At least three semester units, or 45 hours, of instruction regarding the principles of mental health recovery-oriented care and methods of service delivery in recovery-oriented practice environments, including structured meetings with various consumers and family members of consumers of mental health services to enhance understanding of their experience of mental illness, treatment, and recovery.

(B) At least one semester unit, or 15 hours, of instruction that includes an understanding of various California cultures and the social and
 psychological implications of socioeconomic position.

(5) An applicant may complete any units and course content requirements required under paragraphs (3) and (4) not already completed in the applicant’s education while registered as an associate, unless otherwise specified.

(6) On and after January 1, 2021, an applicant for licensure shall show proof of completion of at least six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment
 and intervention using one of the methods specified in Section 4980.396. 

(7) The applicant’s degree title need not be identical to that required by subdivision (b) of Section 4980.36.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 380, Sec. 5.   (SB 679)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4980.81.

This section applies to persons subject to Section 4980.78 who apply for licensure or registration.

(a) For purposes of Section 4980.78, an applicant shall meet all of the following educational requirements:

(1) A minimum of two semester units of instruction in the diagnosis, assessment, prognosis, treatment planning, and treatment of mental disorders, including severe mental disorders, evidence-based practices, and promising mental health practices that are evaluated in peer-reviewed literature.

(2) At least one semester unit or 15 hours of instruction in psychological testing and at least one semester unit or 15 hours of instruction in
 psychopharmacology.

(3) (A) Developmental issues from infancy to old age, including demonstration of at least one semester unit, or 15 hours, of instruction that includes all of the following subjects:

(i) The effects of developmental issues on individuals, couples, and family relationships.

(ii) The psychological, psychotherapeutic, and health implications of developmental issues and their effects.

(iii) The understanding of the impact that personal and social insecurity, social stress, low educational levels, inadequate housing, and malnutrition have on human development.

(B) An applicant who is deficient in any of these subjects may remediate the coursework by
 completing three hours of instruction in each deficient subject.

(4) (A) The broad range of matters and life events that may arise within marriage and family relationships and within a variety of California cultures, including instruction in all of the following:

(i) A minimum of seven contact hours of training or coursework in child abuse assessment and reporting as specified in Section 28 and any regulations promulgated under that section.

(ii) A minimum of 10 contact hours of coursework that includes all of the following:

(I) The assessment and reporting of, as well as treatment related to, elder and dependent adult abuse and neglect.

(II) Aging and its biological,
 social, cognitive, and psychological aspects.

(III) Long-term care.

(IV) End-of-life and grief.

(iii) A minimum of 15 contact hours of coursework in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, intervention strategies, and same-gender abuse dynamics.

(iv) Cultural factors relevant to abuse of partners and family members.

(v) Childbirth, child rearing, parenting, and stepparenting.

(vi) Marriage, divorce, and blended families.

(vii) Poverty and deprivation.

(viii) Financial and social stress.

(ix) Effects of trauma.

(x) The psychological, psychotherapeutic, community, and health implications of the matters and life events described in clauses (i) to (ix), inclusive.

(5) At least one semester unit, or 15 hours, of instruction in multicultural development and cross-cultural interaction, including experiences of race, ethnicity, class, spirituality, sexual orientation, gender, and disability, and their incorporation into the psychotherapeutic process.

(6) A minimum of 10 contact hours of training or coursework in human sexuality, as specified in Section 25 and any regulations promulgated under that section, including the study of physiological, psychological, and social cultural variables associated with sexual behavior and gender identity, and
 the assessment and treatment of psychosexual dysfunction.

(7) A minimum of 15 contact hours of coursework in substance use disorders, and a minimum of 15 contact hours of coursework in co-occurring disorders and addiction. The following subjects shall be included in this coursework:

(A) The definition of substance use disorders, co-occurring disorders, and addiction. For purposes of this subparagraph, “co-occurring disorders” means a mental illness and substance abuse diagnosis occurring simultaneously in an individual.

(B) Medical aspects of substance use disorders and co-occurring disorders.

(C) The effects of psychoactive drug use.

(D) Current theories of the etiology of substance abuse
 and addiction.

(E) The role of persons and systems that support or compound substance abuse and addiction.

(F) Major approaches to identification, evaluation, and treatment of substance use disorders, co-occurring disorders, and addiction, including, but not limited to, best practices.

(G) Legal aspects of substance abuse.

(H) Populations at risk with regard to substance use disorders and co-occurring disorders.

(I) Community resources offering screening, assessment, treatment, and followup for the affected person and family.

(J) Recognition of substance use disorders, co-occurring disorders, and addiction, and appropriate
 referral.

(K) The prevention of substance use disorders and addiction.

(8) A minimum of a two semester or three quarter unit course in law and professional ethics for marriage and family therapists, including instruction in all of the following subjects:

(A) Contemporary professional ethics and statutory, regulatory, and decisional laws that delineate the scope of practice of marriage and family therapy.

(B) The therapeutic, clinical, and practical considerations involved in the legal and ethical practice of marriage and family therapy, including, but not limited to, family law.

(C) The current legal patterns and trends in the mental health professions.

(D) The psychotherapist-patient privilege, confidentiality, the patient dangerous to self or others, and the treatment of minors with and without parental consent.

(E) A recognition and exploration of the relationship between a practitioner’s sense of self and human values and their professional behavior and ethics.

(F) The application of legal and ethical standards in different types of work settings.

(G) Licensing law and licensing process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 29.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Denial, Suspension, and Revocation [4982. - 4982.3.]

4982.

The board may deny a license or registration or may suspend or revoke the license or registration of a licensee or registrant if the licensee or registrant has been guilty of unprofessional conduct. Unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) The conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant under this chapter. The record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence only of the fact that the conviction occurred. The board may inquire into the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime in order to fix the degree of discipline or to determine if the conviction is substantially related to the
 qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant under this chapter. A conviction has the same meaning as defined in Section 7.5. The board may order any license or registration suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license or registration when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or, when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence. All actions pursuant to this subdivision shall be taken pursuant to Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(b) Securing a license or registration by fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation on any application for licensure or registration submitted to the board, whether engaged in by an applicant for a license or registration, or by a licensee in support of any application for licensure or
 registration.

(c) Administering to themselves any controlled substance or using of any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022, or of any alcoholic beverage to the extent, or in a manner, as to be dangerous or injurious to the person applying for a registration or license or holding a registration or license under this chapter, or to any other person, or to the public, or, to the extent that the use impairs the ability of the person applying for or holding a registration or license to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by the registration or license. The board shall deny an application for a registration or license or revoke the license or registration of any person, other than one who is licensed as a physician and surgeon, who uses or offers to use drugs in the course of performing marriage and family therapy
 services.

(d) Gross negligence or incompetence in the performance of marriage and family therapy.

(e) Violating, attempting to violate, or conspiring to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board.

(f) Misrepresentation as to the type or status of a license or registration held by the licensee or registrant or otherwise misrepresenting or permitting misrepresentation of the licensee’s or registrant’s education, professional qualifications, or professional affiliations to any person or entity.

(g) Impersonation of another by any licensee, registrant, or applicant for a license or registration, or, in the case of a
 licensee or registrant, allowing any other person to use the licensee’s or registrant’s license or registration.

(h) Aiding or abetting, or employing, directly or indirectly, any unlicensed or unregistered person to engage in conduct for which a license or registration is required under this chapter.

(i) Intentionally or recklessly causing physical or emotional harm to any client.

(j) The commission of any dishonest, corrupt, or fraudulent act substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant.

(k) Engaging in sexual relations with a client, or a former client within two years following termination of therapy,
 soliciting sexual relations with a client, or committing an act of sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct with a client, or committing an act punishable as a sexually related crime, if that act or solicitation is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a marriage and family therapist.

(l) Performing, or holding oneself out as being able to perform, or offering to perform, or permitting any trainee, registered associate, or applicant for licensure under supervision to perform, any professional services beyond the scope of the license authorized by this chapter.

(m) Failure to maintain confidentiality, except as otherwise required or permitted by law, of all information that has been received from a client in confidence during the course of treatment and
 all information about the client that is obtained from tests or other means.

(n) Prior to the commencement of treatment, failing to disclose to the client or prospective client the fee to be charged for the professional services, or the basis upon which that fee will be computed.

(o) Paying, accepting, or soliciting any consideration, compensation, or remuneration, whether monetary or otherwise, for the referral of professional clients. All consideration, compensation, or remuneration shall be in relation to professional counseling services actually provided by the licensee. This subdivision does not prevent collaboration among two or more licensees in a case or cases. However, a fee shall not be charged for that collaboration, except when disclosure of the fee has been made
 in compliance with subdivision (n).

(p) Advertising in a manner that is false, fraudulent, misleading, or deceptive, as defined in Section 651.

(q) Reproduction or description in public, or in any publication subject to general public distribution, of any psychological test or other assessment device, the value of which depends in whole or in part on the naivete of the subject, in ways that might invalidate the test or device.

(r) Any conduct in the supervision of any registered associate, trainee, or applicant for licensure by any licensee that violates this chapter or any rules or regulations adopted by the board.

(s) Performing or holding oneself out as being able
 to perform mental health services beyond the scope of one’s competence, as established by one’s education, training, or experience. This subdivision shall not be construed to expand the scope of the license authorized by this chapter.

(t) Permitting a trainee, registered associate, or applicant for licensure under one’s supervision or control to perform, or permitting the trainee, registered associate, or applicant for licensure to hold themselves out as competent to perform, mental health services beyond the trainee’s, registered associate’s, or applicant for licensure’s level of education, training, or experience.

(u) The violation of any statute or regulation governing the gaining and supervision of experience required by this chapter.

(v) Failure to keep records consistent with sound clinical judgment, the standards of the profession, and the nature of the services being rendered.

(w) Failure to comply with the child abuse reporting requirements of Section 11166 of the Penal Code.

(x) Failure to comply with the elder and dependent adult abuse reporting requirements of Section 15630 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(y) Willful violation of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 123100) of Part 1 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(z) Failure to comply with the procedures set forth in Section 2290.5 when delivering health care via telehealth.

(aa) (1) Engaging in an act described in Section 261, 286, 287, or 289 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code with a minor or an act described in Section 288 or 288.5 of the Penal Code regardless of whether the act occurred prior to or after the time the registration or license was issued by the board. An act described in this subdivision occurring prior to the effective date of this subdivision shall constitute unprofessional conduct and shall subject the licensee to refusal, suspension, or revocation of a license under this section.

(2) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that protection of the public, and in particular minors, from sexual misconduct by a licensee is a compelling governmental interest, and that the ability
 to suspend or revoke a license for sexual conduct with a minor occurring prior to the effective date of this section is equally important to protecting the public as is the ability to refuse a license for sexual conduct with a minor occurring prior to the effective date of this section.

(ab) Engaging in any conduct that subverts or attempts to subvert any licensing examination or the administration of an examination as described in Section 123.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 65.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4982.01.

(a) The Board of Behavioral Sciences shall require an applicant for marriage and family therapist licensure or registration as an associate marriage and family therapist, as defined in Sections 4980, 4980.02, and 4980.03, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to Section 144. 

(b) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 15.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4982.1.

The board may refuse to issue any registration or license whenever it appears that an applicant may be unable to practice his or her profession safely due to mental illness or chemical dependency. The procedures set forth in Article 12.5 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 shall apply to any denial of a license or registration pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 384, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4982.15.

(a) The board may place a license or registration on probation under the following circumstances:

(1) In lieu of, or in addition to, any order of the board suspending or revoking the license or registration of any licensee or associate.

(2) Upon the issuance of a license to an individual who has been guilty of unprofessional conduct, but who had otherwise completed all education and training and experience required for licensure.

(3) As a condition upon the reissuance or reinstatement of any license that has been suspended or revoked by the board.

(b) The board may adopt regulations establishing a monitoring program to ensure compliance with any terms or conditions of probation imposed by the board pursuant to subdivision (a). The cost of probation or monitoring may be ordered to be paid by the licensee, registrant, or applicant.

(c) The board, in its discretion, may require any licensee or registrant who has been placed on probation, or whose license or registration has been suspended, to obtain additional professional training, and to pass an examination upon completion of that training, and to pay any necessary examination fee. The examination may be written, oral, or a practical or clinical examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 743, Sec. 21.   (AB 93)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4982.25.

The board may deny an application, or may suspend or revoke a license or registration issued under this chapter, for any of the following:

(a) Denial of licensure, revocation, suspension, restriction, or any other disciplinary action imposed by another state or territory or possession of the United States, or by any other governmental agency, on a license, certificate, or registration to practice marriage and family therapy, or any other healing art, shall constitute unprofessional conduct. A certified copy of the disciplinary action decision or judgment shall be conclusive evidence of that action.

(b) Revocation, suspension, or restriction by the board of a license, certificate,
 or registration to practice as a marriage and family therapist, clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, or educational psychologist shall also constitute grounds for disciplinary action for unprofessional conduct against the licensee or registrant under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 350, Sec. 31.   (SB 943)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4982.26.

The board shall revoke any license issued under this chapter upon a decision made in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, that contains any finding of fact that the licensee or registrant engaged in any act of sexual contact, as defined in Section 729, when that act is with a patient, or with a former patient when the relationship was terminated primarily for the purpose of engaging in that act. The revocation shall not be stayed by the administrative law judge or the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 658, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4982.3.

The proceedings conducted under this article shall be held in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1365, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Penalties [4983. - 4983.1.]

4983.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1365, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

4983.1.

In addition to other proceedings provided for in this chapter, whenever any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices which constitute, or will constitute, an offense against this chapter, the superior court in and for the county wherein the acts or practices take place, or are about to take place, may issue an injunction, or other appropriate order, restraining such conduct on application of the board, the Attorney General, or the district attorney of the county.

The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1365, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Revenue [4984. - 4984.9.]

4984.

(a) Licenses issued under this chapter shall expire no more than 24 months after the issue date. The expiration date of the original license shall be set by the board.

(b) To renew an unexpired license, the licensee, on or before the expiration date of the license, shall do all of the following:

(1) Apply for a renewal on a form prescribed by the board.

(2) Pay a two-year renewal fee prescribed by the board.

(3) Certify compliance with the continuing education requirements set forth in Section 4980.54.

(4) Notify the board whether he or she has been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, or whether any disciplinary action has been taken by any regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state, subsequent to the licensee’s last renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 836, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4984.01.

(a) The associate marriage and family therapist registration shall expire one year from the last day of the month in which it was issued.

(b) To renew the registration, the registrant shall, on or before the expiration date of the registration, complete all of the following actions:

(1) Apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board.

(2) Pay a renewal fee prescribed by the board.

(3) Participate in the California law and ethics examination pursuant to Section 4980.399 each year until successful completion of this examination.

(4) Notify the board whether
 they have been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, and whether any disciplinary action has been taken against them by a regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state subsequent to the last renewal of the registration.

(5) Certify under penalty of perjury their compliance with the continuing education requirements set forth in Section 4980.54.

(c) An expired registration may be renewed by completing all of the actions described in paragraphs (1) to
 (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(d) The registration may be renewed a maximum of five times. No registration shall be renewed or reinstated beyond six years from the last day of the month during which it was issued, regardless of whether it has been revoked. When no further renewals are possible, an applicant may apply for and obtain a subsequent associate registration number if the applicant meets the educational requirements for a subsequent associate registration number and has passed the California law and ethics examination. An applicant who is issued a subsequent associate registration number pursuant to this subdivision shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 520, Sec. 5.   (AB 1759)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4984.1.

A licensee may renew a license at any time within three years after its expiration by completing all of the actions described in subdivision (b) of Section 4984 and paying any delinquency fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 588, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4984.2.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the licensee, while it remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the activity to which the license relates, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which it was suspended.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1365, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

4984.3.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee shall, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1365, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

4984.4.

A license that is not renewed within three years after its expiration shall not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued; however, the former licensee may apply for and obtain a new license if the following criteria are satisfied:

(a) No fact, circumstance, or condition exists that, if the license were issued, would constitute grounds for its revocation or suspension.

(b) He or she submits an application for licensure and the fee for that application.

(c) He or she takes and passes the current licensing examinations.

(d) He or she submits the fee for initial license issuance.

(e) He or she complies with the fingerprint requirements established by board regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 7.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4984.41.

(a) (1) The board shall issue, upon submission of a completed application as prescribed by this section and payment of the fee fixed by this chapter, a retired license to a marriage and family therapist who holds a license that is current and active or a license that is inactive, and whose license is not suspended, revoked, or otherwise punitively restricted by the board or subject to disciplinary action under this chapter.

(2) A marriage and family therapist license that has expired shall be issued a retired license by the board upon submission of a completed application as prescribed by this section and payment of the fee fixed by this chapter if both of the
 following requirements are met:

(A) The license expired within three years from the date of the board’s receipt of a completed application.

(B) Immediately preceding the license expiration, and after the license expiration, the license was not suspended, revoked, or otherwise punitively restricted by the board or subject to disciplinary action under this chapter.

(3) For purposes of this section, “subject to disciplinary action” shall mean that the licensee had an unsatisfied cost recovery, fine or restitution order, an accusation or petition to revoke probation that has been served on the licensee alleging violations of their probation or the chapter, or an unresolved complaint or investigation pending with
 the board.

(b) To apply for a retired license, the applicant shall submit a completed application to the board providing all of the following information:

(1) Full name as filed with the board.

(2) Board license type, license number, and expiration date.

(3) Date of birth.

(4) Social security number or individual taxpayer identification number.

(5) A statement signed under penalty of perjury that the information provided on the application is true and correct, that the applicant understands that the holder of a retired license may not
 engage in any activity for which the active license was issued, and that the applicant hereby requests their license to be changed to retired status.

(c) The holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity for which an active marriage and family therapist license is required.

(d) The holder of a retired license shall utilize their professional title only with the unabbreviated word “retired” directly preceding or directly following the professional title. 

(e) The holder of a retired license shall not be required to renew that license.

(f) The holder of a retired license may apply to restore to active status their
 license to practice marriage and family therapy if that retired license was issued less than three years prior to the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board. A retired license may be restored to active status one time only. To restore a retired license to active status, the applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Submit a completed application to the board containing all of the following information:

(A) Full name as filed with the board.

(B) Original board license type and original license number and expiration date.

(C) Date of birth.

(D) Social security number or individual taxpayer identification number.

(E) Whether they have been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, or whether any disciplinary action has been taken by any regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state subsequent to the issuance of the retired license.

(F) A statement signed under penalty of perjury that the information provided on the application is true and correct, that the applicant did not engage in any activity for which an active license is required while the license was in retired status, and that the applicant hereby requests their license to be changed to “active” status. 

(2) Has not committed an act or crime constituting
 grounds for denial of licensure.

(3) Pays the renewal fee required by this chapter.

(4) Completes the required continuing education as specified in Section 4980.54.

(5) Complies with the fingerprint submission requirements established in Section 144.

(g) An applicant requesting to restore their license pursuant to subdivision (f) whose retired license was issued in accordance with this section less than one year from the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board shall complete 18 hours of continuing education taken within the two years prior to the date the application to restore the retired license is received by
 the board. This coursework shall include a minimum of six hours in the subject of California law and ethics.

(h) An applicant requesting to restore their license pursuant to subdivision (f) whose retired license was issued in accordance with this section one or more years from the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board shall complete 36 hours of continuing education taken within the two years prior to the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board. This coursework shall include a minimum of six hours in the subject of California law and ethics.

(i) A retired license that was issued three or more years prior shall not be restored. The holder of the retired license may apply for and obtain a new license if all of the
 following criteria are satisfied:

(1) Has not committed an act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure.

(2) Applies for licensure and pays the fee required by this chapter.

(3) Passes the examinations required for licensure.

(4) Complies with the fingerprint submission requirements established in Section 144.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 67.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4984.5.

The board shall report each month to the Controller the amount and source of all revenue received pursuant to this chapter and at the same time pay the entire amount thereof into the State Treasury for credit to the Behavioral Sciences Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4984.7.

(a) The board shall assess the following fees relating to the licensure of marriage and family therapists:

(1) The application fee for an associate registration shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).

(2) The annual renewal fee for an associate registration shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).

(3) The fee for the application
 for licensure shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).

(4) (A) (i) The fee for the board-administered clinical examination, if the board chooses to adopt this examination in regulations, shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500). If the board chooses to adopt an examination administered by a public or private organization, as specified by the board in regulations, then the examination fee shall be determined by, and paid directly to, that organization.

(ii) The fee for the California law and ethics
 examination shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of three hundred dollars ($300).

(B) An applicant who fails to appear for an examination, after having been scheduled to take the examination, shall forfeit the examination fee.

(C) The amount of the examination fees shall be based on the actual cost to the board of developing, purchasing, and grading each examination and the actual cost to the board of administering each examination. The examination fees shall be adjusted periodically by regulation to reflect the actual costs incurred by the board.

(5) The fee for rescoring an examination shall be twenty dollars ($20).

(6) The fee for the issuance of an initial license shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).

(7) The fee for the two-year license renewal shall be two hundred dollars ($200). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).

(8) The renewal delinquency fee shall be one-half of the fee for license renewal. A person who permits their license to expire is subject to the delinquency fee.

(9) The fee for issuance of a replacement registration, license, or certificate shall be twenty dollars
 ($20).

(10) The fee for issuance of a certificate or letter of good standing shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(11) The fee for issuance of a retired license shall be forty dollars ($40).

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 68.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4984.72.

(a) Effective January 1, 2016, an applicant who fails the clinical examination may, within one year from the notification date of that failure, retake the examination as regularly scheduled without further application upon payment of the fee for the examination. Thereafter, the applicant shall not be eligible for further examination until he or she files a new application, meets all requirements in effect on the date of application, and pays all required fees.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 44) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 35.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4984.75.

(a) In addition to the fees charged pursuant to Section 4984.7 for the biennial renewal of a license pursuant to Section 4984, the board shall collect an additional fee of twenty dollars ($20) at the time of renewal. The board shall transfer this amount to the Controller who shall deposit the funds in the Mental Health Practitioner Education Fund.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 557, Sec. 4.   (AB 1188)   Effective October 7, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4984.8.

(a) A licensee may apply to the board to request that his or her license be placed on inactive status.

(b) A licensee on inactive status shall be subject to this chapter and shall not engage in the practice of marriage and family therapy in this state.

(c) A licensee who holds an inactive license shall pay a biennial fee in the amount of one-half of the standard renewal fee and shall be exempt from continuing education requirements.

(d) A licensee on inactive status who has not committed an act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure may,
 upon request, restore his or her license to practice marriage and family therapy to active status.

(1) A licensee requesting to restore his or her license to active status between renewal cycles shall pay the remaining one-half of his or her renewal fee.

(2) A licensee requesting to restore his or her license to active status, whose license will expire less than one year from the date of the request, shall complete 18 hours of continuing education as specified in Section 4980.54.

(3) A licensee requesting to restore his or her license to active status, whose license will expire more than one year from the date of the request, shall complete 36 hours of continuing education as specified in Section 4980.54.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 43.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4984.9.
